Utah statutes.
58-54-5.   Requirements for licensure.

(1)  Each applicant for licensure as a radiology technologist or radiology practical technician shall:

(a)  submit an application in a form prescribed by the division in collaboration with the board;

(b)  pay a fee as determined by the department pursuant to Section 63J-1-504; and

(c)  be of good moral character.

(2)  Each applicant for licensure as a radiology technologist shall, in addition to the requirements of Subsection (1):

(a)  be a graduate of an accredited educational program in radiology technology or certified by the American Registry of Radiologic Technologists or any equivalent educational program approved by the division in collaboration with the board; and

(b)  have passed an examination approved by the division in collaboration with the board.

(3)  Each applicant for licensure as a radiology practical technician shall, in addition to the requirements of Subsection (1), have passed a basic examination and one or more specialty examinations that are competency based, using a task analysis of the scope of practice of radiology practical technicians in the state.  The basic examination and the specialty examination shall be approved by the division in collaboration with the board and the licensing board of the profession within which the radiology practical technician will be practicing.

(4)  The division shall provide for administration of the radiology practical technician examination not less than monthly at offices designated by the division and located:

(a)  in Salt Lake City; and

(b)  within each local health department jurisdictional area.

